test/src/morphology/N-peraedue3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - perädü: # Noun (3) perädü 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     perädü+N+Sg+Nom: perädü
     perädü+N+Sg+Gen: perädü
     perädü+N+Sg+Par: perätüt
     perädü+N+Sg+Ill: perätühe
     perädü+N+Pl+Gen: perätüide
     perädü+N+Pl+Par: perätüid
     perädü+N+Pl+Ill: perätüihe
     perädü+N+Pl+All: perätüile
